Louisiana, session 2026, HB817.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:1141.51 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1141.51. Homeowner Bill of Rights
A. This Section may be known and cited as the "Louisiana Homeowner Bill
of Rights".
B. The purpose of this Section is to protect the rights of homeowners in
planned communities governed by homeowners associations, promote transparency
and accountability in association operations, ensure fair governance, and balance the
interests of associations and members consistent with the Louisiana Planned
Community Act.
C. This Section applies to all associations as defined in R.S. 9:1141.2,
regardless of date of creation, unless expressly exempted in this Section.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-364 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 817
Associations shall convert existing governing documents to conform to the
requirements of this Section.
D.(1) Every association shall establish an online homeowner portal
accessible to members for posting official records, meeting notices, and governing
documents. Associations with one hundred or more parcels shall also maintain a
dedicated website for the same purpose.
(2) Associations shall provide to each member a physical or digital copy of
the current declaration, bylaws, rules, and covenants and shall provide such
documents to new members within thirty days of purchase.
(3) Associations shall post complete governing documents on the
homeowner portal or association website and provide electronic or written notice to
members.
(4) Members shall have the right to inspect and copy association records,
including financials, minutes that exclude executive sessions, contracts, and
insurance policies, within fourteen business days of written request. For good cause
shown, records not subject to inspection or copy are personnel or medical
information, litigation matters, attorney-client privileged communications,
court-ordered confidential documents, individual owner files, unlisted contact
information, security data, and nondisclosure agreements.
(5) Associations shall retain ballots for one year and the following records
for at least seven years:
(a) Budgets.
(b) Monthly financial statements.
(c) Minutes.
(d) Owner lists.
(e) Governing documents.
(f) Tax returns.
(g) Contracts.
(h) Insurance policies.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-364 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 817
E.(1) The executive board shall include at least a president, vice-president,
secretary, and treasurer.
(2)(a) Homeowners shall elect at least one member-at-large when fifty
percent of parcels in the first phase are sold to nondevelopers. A developer
maintains majority control until ninety percent of parcels in the final phase are sold,
after which, homeowners hold majority control with the developer retaining one
designated seat.
(b) If further development occurs after majority control by the homeowners,
homeowners retain majority control with the developer retaining the one seat.
(3) A developer shall notify members when ninety percent of parcels in the
final phase are sold and shall call a special meeting within ninety days for elections.
F.(1) Associations shall hold at least one annual meeting of members per
fiscal year with virtual options available for accessibility.
(2) Special meetings may be called by the president, majority of the board,
or twenty percent of members.
(3) Meeting notices and agenda items shall be posted conspicuously on the
homeowner portal or association website and sent via mail or e-mail at least
twenty-four hours in advance.
(4) Agendas shall be available twenty-four hours in advance and members
may speak on agenda items before action of the executive board.
G.(1) Contracts or services over ten thousand dollars require written bids
solicited from vendors.
(2) All contracts funded by the association require public bidding.
(3) Members may inspect management contracts with proper written notice.
H.(1) Annual budgets shall detail expenses which include but are not limited
to maintenance, utilities, insurance, and reserves, and be sent to members within ten
days of the start of the association's fiscal year with quarterly updates showing
expenditures, fines, and variances.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-364 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 817
(2) Any surplus funds that are not on reserve shall be returned or credited to
the members.
(3) Any budgets and updates shall be filed with the Department of Justice,
office of the attorney general, and be retained by the association for five years.
(4) Dues shall be assessed proportionally by the total expenses divided by
the number of parcels unless amended by majority vote.
(5) Regular assessments shall not increase more than twenty percent
annually without member approval.
(6) Any increase in the budget or dues or unbudgeted expenditures over ten
thousand dollars requires a forty-eight hour notice to members. Any large
unbudgeted items require quorum approval.
I.(1) Liens for unpaid assessments require notice and prior good faith efforts
to resolve the issue. A judicial hearing shall prove delinquency by clear and
convincing evidence. There shall be no liens for fines and no foreclosure on liens
or fines.
(2) The developer is liable for legal fees for liens related to initial
development obligations.
(3) Fines require a schedule, dispute resolution process, notice, opportunity
for a hearing for at least ten days prior to the hearing, and decisions shall be in
writing. Fines are limited to one hundred dollars per violation at a maximum of two
thousand five hundred dollars for ongoing issues.
(4) There shall be no fines for garbage receptacles out less than twenty-four
hours beyond collection or for holiday decorations displayed beyond the rules unless
the member takes no action one week after a notice.
(5) Associations shall not prohibit parking of personal vehicles or
noncommercial work vehicles in driveways or first-responder vehicles on a public
street.
J. The attorney general shall collect, track, and publish data on homeowner
complaints against associations.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-364 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 817
K. Associations that violate the provisions of this Section may be liable to
members or the state for damages and attorney fees.
L. Associations shall annually provide to members and new owners
education on rights and responsibilities at no cost.
Section 2. Associations shall convert existing governing documents to conform to
the requirements as provided in R.S. 9:1141.51(C) as enacted by Section 1 of this Act by
January 1, 2027.
Section 3. Associations shall establish an online portal as prescribed in R.S.
9:1141.51(D) as enacted by Section 1 of this Act by January 1, 2027.